Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 2. Survey and Planning

§ 35-2-320.
Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to make an inventory of existing hospitals and medical facilities, including public, nonprofit and proprietary hospitals and medical facilities, to survey the need for construction of hospitals and medical facilities, and, on the basis of such inventory and survey, to develop a program for the construction of such public and other nonprofit hospitals and medical facilities as will, in conjunction with existing facilities, afford the necessary physical facilities for furnishing adequate hospital, medical facility and similar services to all the people of the state.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 7; 1957, ch. 196, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-104.

§ 35-2-321.
Construction program.

The construction program shall provide, in accordance with regulations prescribed under the federal act, for adequate hospital facilities for the people residing in this state and insofar as possible shall provide for their distribution throughout the state in such manner as to make all types of hospital and medical facility services reasonably accessible to all persons in the state.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 8; 1957, ch. 196, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-105.

§ 35-2-322.
Application for and use of federal funds.

The commissioner is authorized to make application to the surgeon general for federal funds to assist in carrying out the survey and planning activities herein provided. Such funds shall be deposited in the state treasury and shall be available for expenditure for carrying out the purposes of W.S.

35-2-320

through

35-2-322

. Any such funds received and not expended for such purposes shall be repaid to the treasury of the United States.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-106.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 18, ch. 159, Laws 1947, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (42 USC § 1395dd), 104 ALR Fed 166.